Illinois, session 104th, HB2483.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 901 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/901)7    Sec. 901. Collection authority. 8    (a) In general. The Department shall collect the taxes 9imposed by this Act. The Department shall collect certified 10past due child support amounts under Section 2505-650 of the 11Department of Revenue Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 12Illinois. Except as provided in subsections (b), (c), (e), 13(f), (g), and (h) of this Section, money collected pursuant to 14subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act shall be 15paid into the General Revenue Fund in the State treasury; 16money collected pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of Section 17201 of this Act shall be paid into the Personal Property Tax 18Replacement Fund, a special fund in the State Treasury; and 19money collected under Section 2505-650 of the Department of 20Revenue Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois shall 21be paid into the Child Support Enforcement Trust Fund, a 22special fund outside the State Treasury, or to the State 23Disbursement Unit established under Section 10-26 of the   HB2483- 2 -LRB104 03447 HLH 20736 b1Illinois Public Aid Code, as directed by the Department of 2Healthcare and Family Services.3    (b) Local Government Distributive Fund. Beginning August 41, 2017 and continuing through July 31, 2022, the Treasurer 5shall transfer each month from the General Revenue Fund to the 6Local Government Distributive Fund an amount equal to the sum 7of: (i) 6.06% (10% of the ratio of the 3% individual income tax 8rate prior to 2011 to the 4.95% individual income tax rate 9after July 1, 2017) of the net revenue realized from the tax 10imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 11upon individuals, trusts, and estates during the preceding 12month; (ii) 6.85% (10% of the ratio of the 4.8% corporate 13income tax rate prior to 2011 to the 7% corporate income tax 14rate after July 1, 2017) of the net revenue realized from the 15tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this 16Act upon corporations during the preceding month; and (iii) 17beginning February 1, 2022, 6.06% of the net revenue realized 18from the tax imposed by subsection (p) of Section 201 of this 19Act upon electing pass-through entities. Beginning August 1, 202022 and continuing through July 31, 2023, the Treasurer shall 21transfer each month from the General Revenue Fund to the Local 22Government Distributive Fund an amount equal to the sum of: 23(i) 6.16% of the net revenue realized from the tax imposed by 24subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act upon 25individuals, trusts, and estates during the preceding month; 26(ii) 6.85% of the net revenue realized from the tax imposed by   HB2483- 3 -LRB104 03447 HLH 20736 b1subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act upon 2corporations during the preceding month; and (iii) 6.16% of 3the net revenue realized from the tax imposed by subsection 4(p) of Section 201 of this Act upon electing pass-through 5entities. Beginning August 1, 2023, the Treasurer shall 6transfer each month from the General Revenue Fund to the Local 7Government Distributive Fund an amount equal to the sum of: 8(i) 6.47% of the net revenue realized from the tax imposed by 9subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act upon 10individuals, trusts, and estates during the preceding month; 11(ii) 6.85% of the net revenue realized from the tax imposed by 12subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act upon 13corporations during the preceding month; and (iii) 6.47% of 14the net revenue realized from the tax imposed by subsection 15(p) of Section 201 of this Act upon electing pass-through 16entities. Net revenue realized for a month shall be defined as 17the revenue from the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 18Section 201 of this Act which is deposited into the General 19Revenue Fund, the Education Assistance Fund, the Income Tax 20Surcharge Local Government Distributive Fund, the Fund for the 21Advancement of Education, and the Commitment to Human Services 22Fund during the month minus the amount paid out of the General 23Revenue Fund in State warrants during that same month as 24refunds to taxpayers for overpayment of liability under the 25tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this 26Act.  HB2483- 4 -LRB104 03447 HLH 20736 b1    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 2beginning on July 6, 2017 (the effective date of Public Act 3100-23), those amounts required under this subsection (b) to 4be transferred by the Treasurer into the Local Government 5Distributive Fund from the General Revenue Fund shall be 6directly deposited into the Local Government Distributive Fund 7as the revenue is realized from the tax imposed by subsections 8(a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act.9    (c) Deposits Into Income Tax Refund Fund.10        (1) Beginning on January 1, 1989 and thereafter, the 11    Department shall deposit a percentage of the amounts 12    collected pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)(1), (2), and 13    (3) of Section 201 of this Act into a fund in the State 14    treasury known as the Income Tax Refund Fund. Beginning 15    with State fiscal year 1990 and for each fiscal year 16    thereafter, the percentage deposited into the Income Tax 17    Refund Fund during a fiscal year shall be the Annual 18    Percentage. For fiscal year 2011, the Annual Percentage 19    shall be 8.75%. For fiscal year 2012, the Annual 20    Percentage shall be 8.75%. For fiscal year 2013, the 21    Annual Percentage shall be 9.75%. For fiscal year 2014, 22    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.5%. For fiscal year 2015, 23    the Annual Percentage shall be 10%. For fiscal year 2018, 24    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.8%. For fiscal year 2019, 25    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.7%. For fiscal year 2020, 26    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.5%. For fiscal year 2021,   HB2483- 5 -LRB104 03447 HLH 20736 b1    the Annual Percentage shall be 9%. For fiscal year 2022, 2    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.25%. For fiscal year 3    2023, the Annual Percentage shall be 9.25%. For fiscal 4    year 2024, the Annual Percentage shall be 9.15%. For 5    fiscal year 2025, the Annual Percentage shall be 9.15%. 6    For all other fiscal years, the Annual Percentage shall be 7    calculated as a fraction, the numerator of which shall be 8    the amount of refunds approved for payment by the 9    Department during the preceding fiscal year as a result of 10    overpayment of tax liability under subsections (a) and 11    (b)(1), (2), and (3) of Section 201 of this Act plus the 12    amount of such refunds remaining approved but unpaid at 13    the end of the preceding fiscal year, minus the amounts 14    transferred into the Income Tax Refund Fund from the 15    Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund, and the denominator of 16    which shall be the amounts which will be collected 17    pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)(1), (2), and (3) of 18    Section 201 of this Act during the preceding fiscal year; 19    except that in State fiscal year 2002, the Annual 20    Percentage shall in no event exceed 7.6%. The Director of 21    Revenue shall certify the Annual Percentage to the 22    Comptroller on the last business day of the fiscal year 23    immediately preceding the fiscal year for which it is to 24    be effective.25        (2) Beginning on January 1, 1989 and thereafter, the 26    Department shall deposit a percentage of the amounts   HB2483- 6 -LRB104 03447 HLH 20736 b1    collected pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)(6), (7), and 2    (8), (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act into a fund in 3    the State treasury known as the Income Tax Refund Fund. 4    Beginning with State fiscal year 1990 and for each fiscal 5    year thereafter, the percentage deposited into the Income 6    Tax Refund Fund during a fiscal year shall be the Annual 7    Percentage. For fiscal year 2011, the Annual Percentage 8    shall be 17.5%. For fiscal year 2012, the Annual 9    Percentage shall be 17.5%. For fiscal year 2013, the 10    Annual Percentage shall be 14%. For fiscal year 2014, the 11    Annual Percentage shall be 13.4%. For fiscal year 2015, 12    the Annual Percentage shall be 14%. For fiscal year 2018, 13    the Annual Percentage shall be 17.5%. For fiscal year 14    2019, the Annual Percentage shall be 15.5%. For fiscal 15    year 2020, the Annual Percentage shall be 14.25%. For 16    fiscal year 2021, the Annual Percentage shall be 14%. For 17    fiscal year 2022, the Annual Percentage shall be 15%. For 18    fiscal year 2023, the Annual Percentage shall be 14.5%. 19    For fiscal year 2024, the Annual Percentage shall be 14%. 20    For fiscal year 2025, the Annual Percentage shall be 14%. 21    For all other fiscal years, the Annual Percentage shall be 22    calculated as a fraction, the numerator of which shall be 23    the amount of refunds approved for payment by the 24    Department during the preceding fiscal year as a result of 25    overpayment of tax liability under subsections (a) and 26    (b)(6), (7), and (8), (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this   HB2483- 7 -LRB104 03447 HLH 20736 b1    Act plus the amount of such refunds remaining approved but 2    unpaid at the end of the preceding fiscal year, and the 3    denominator of which shall be the amounts which will be 4    collected pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)(6), (7), and 5    (8), (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act during the 6    preceding fiscal year; except that in State fiscal year 7    2002, the Annual Percentage shall in no event exceed 23%. 8    The Director of Revenue shall certify the Annual 9    Percentage to the Comptroller on the last business day of 10    the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year for 11    which it is to be effective.12        (3) The Comptroller shall order transferred and the 13    Treasurer shall transfer from the Tobacco Settlement 14    Recovery Fund to the Income Tax Refund Fund (i) 15    $35,000,000 in January, 2001, (ii) $35,000,000 in January, 16    2002, and (iii) $35,000,000 in January, 2003.17    (d) Expenditures from Income Tax Refund Fund.18        (1) Beginning January 1, 1989, money in the Income Tax 19    Refund Fund shall be expended exclusively for the purpose 20    of paying refunds resulting from overpayment of tax 21    liability under Section 201 of this Act and for making 22    transfers pursuant to this subsection (d), except that in 23    State fiscal years 2022 and 2023, moneys in the Income Tax 24    Refund Fund shall also be used to pay one-time rebate 25    payments as provided under Sections 208.5 and 212.1.26        (2) The Director shall order payment of refunds   HB2483- 8 -LRB104 03447 HLH 20736 b1    resulting from overpayment of tax liability under Section 2    201 of this Act from the Income Tax Refund Fund only to the 3    extent that amounts collected pursuant to Section 201 of 4    this Act and transfers pursuant to this subsection (d) and 5    item (3) of subsection (c) have been deposited and 6    retained in the Fund.7        (3) As soon as possible after the end of each fiscal 8    year, the Director shall order transferred and the State 9    Treasurer and State Comptroller shall transfer from the 10    Income Tax Refund Fund to the Personal Property Tax 11    Replacement Fund an amount, certified by the Director to 12    the Comptroller, equal to the excess of the amount 13    collected pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of Section 14    201 of this Act deposited into the Income Tax Refund Fund 15    during the fiscal year over the amount of refunds 16    resulting from overpayment of tax liability under 17    subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act paid 18    from the Income Tax Refund Fund during the fiscal year.19        (4) As soon as possible after the end of each fiscal 20    year, the Director shall order transferred and the State 21    Treasurer and State Comptroller shall transfer from the 22    Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund to the Income Tax 23    Refund Fund an amount, certified by the Director to the 24    Comptroller, equal to the excess of the amount of refunds 25    resulting from overpayment of tax liability under 26    subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act paid   HB2483- 9 -LRB104 03447 HLH 20736 b1    from the Income Tax Refund Fund during the fiscal year 2    over the amount collected pursuant to subsections (c) and 3    (d) of Section 201 of this Act deposited into the Income 4    Tax Refund Fund during the fiscal year.5        (4.5) As soon as possible after the end of fiscal year 6    1999 and of each fiscal year thereafter, the Director 7    shall order transferred and the State Treasurer and State 8    Comptroller shall transfer from the Income Tax Refund Fund 9    to the General Revenue Fund any surplus remaining in the 10    Income Tax Refund Fund as of the end of such fiscal year; 11    excluding for fiscal years 2000, 2001, and 2002 amounts 12    attributable to transfers under item (3) of subsection (c) 13    less refunds resulting from the earned income tax credit, 14    and excluding for fiscal year 2022 amounts attributable to 15    transfers from the General Revenue Fund authorized by 16    Public Act 102-700. For purposes of this item (4.5), 17    "surplus" means the cash balance in the Income Tax Refund 18    Fund at the end of such fiscal year, less amounts 19    attributable to transfers under item (3) of this 20    subsection (d). 21        (5) This Act shall constitute an irrevocable and 22    continuing appropriation from the Income Tax Refund Fund 23    for the purposes of (i) paying refunds upon the order of 24    the Director in accordance with the provisions of this 25    Section and (ii) paying one-time rebate payments under 26    Sections 208.5 and 212.1.  HB2483- 10 -LRB104 03447 HLH 20736 b1    (e) Deposits into the Education Assistance Fund and the 2Income Tax Surcharge Local Government Distributive Fund. On 3July 1, 1991, and thereafter, of the amounts collected 4pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act, 5minus deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, the Department 6shall deposit 7.3% into the Education Assistance Fund in the 7State Treasury. Beginning July 1, 1991, and continuing through 8January 31, 1993, of the amounts collected pursuant to 9subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income 10Tax Act, minus deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, the 11Department shall deposit 3.0% into the Income Tax Surcharge 12Local Government Distributive Fund in the State Treasury. 13Beginning February 1, 1993 and continuing through June 30, 141993, of the amounts collected pursuant to subsections (a) and 15(b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act, minus 16deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, the Department shall 17deposit 4.4% into the Income Tax Surcharge Local Government 18Distributive Fund in the State Treasury. Beginning July 1, 191993, and continuing through June 30, 1994, of the amounts 20collected under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this 21Act, minus deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, the 22Department shall deposit 1.475% into the Income Tax Surcharge 23Local Government Distributive Fund in the State Treasury.24    (f) Deposits into the Fund for the Advancement of 25Education. Beginning February 1, 2015, the Department shall 26deposit the following portions of the revenue realized from   HB2483- 11 -LRB104 03447 HLH 20736 b1the tax imposed upon individuals, trusts, and estates by 2subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act, minus 3deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, into the Fund for the 4Advancement of Education: 5        (1) beginning February 1, 2015, and prior to February 6    1, 2025, 1/30; and 7        (2) beginning February 1, 2025, 1/26. 8    If the rate of tax imposed by subsection (a) and (b) of 9Section 201 is reduced pursuant to Section 201.5 of this Act, 10the Department shall not make the deposits required by this 11subsection (f) on or after the effective date of the 12reduction. 13    (g) Deposits into the Commitment to Human Services Fund. 14Beginning February 1, 2015, the Department shall deposit the 15following portions of the revenue realized from the tax 16imposed upon individuals, trusts, and estates by subsections 17(a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act, minus deposits into the 18Income Tax Refund Fund, into the Commitment to Human Services 19Fund: 20        (1) beginning February 1, 2015, and prior to February 21    1, 2025, 1/30; and 22        (2) beginning February 1, 2025, 1/26. 23    If the rate of tax imposed by subsection (a) and (b) of 24Section 201 is reduced pursuant to Section 201.5 of this Act, 25the Department shall not make the deposits required by this 26subsection (g) on or after the effective date of the   HB2483- 12 -LRB104 03447 HLH 20736 b1reduction. 2    (h) Deposits into the Tax Compliance and Administration 3Fund. Beginning on the first day of the first calendar month to 4occur on or after August 26, 2014 (the effective date of Public 5Act 98-1098), each month the Department shall pay into the Tax 6Compliance and Administration Fund, to be used, subject to 7appropriation, to fund additional auditors and compliance 8personnel at the Department, an amount equal to 1/12 of 5% of 9the cash receipts collected during the preceding fiscal year 10by the Audit Bureau of the Department from the tax imposed by 11subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d) of Section 201 of this Act, 12net of deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund made from those 13cash receipts. 14(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 15102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, eff. 164-19-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, 17eff. 6-30-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.